Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-829
Critical Infrastructure Utility Worker Protection Act; act, how cited.

Sections 81-829 to 81-829.04 shall be known and may be cited as the Critical Infrastructure Utility Worker Protection Act.

Laws 2023, LB191, § 1.